Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 18 Rhode Island Public Transit Authority

39-18-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning:

“Authority” means the Rhode Island public transit authority created by §

39-18-2

, or, if the authority shall be abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof, or upon whom the powers of the authority given by this chapter shall be given by law.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, including temporary notes of the authority issued in anticipation of revenues to be received by the authority or in anticipation of the receipt of federal, state, or local grants or other aid.

“Municipality” means any town, city, or subdivision thereof.

“Transit property” means and includes any property, whether real or personal, and any apparatus and equipment used or useful in the operation of a motor bus, water, or rail passenger transportation line or system, and includes any rights or franchises to operate any passenger transportation line or system, but it does not include other property or assets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 256, § 1.

39-18-1.1.
Findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

Rhode Island has had a long and rich legacy of providing public transit services that contribute to the fabric of the state;

Public transit continues to evolve and can play increasingly important roles in the future;

Public transit services provide benefits to the quality of communities by curtailing energy consumption, helping people participate in their communities by offering mobility options, defining spaces and promoting sound urban design, and linking activity centers to support social networks;

Pedestrian access and safety is crucial to supporting public transit services;

One of the values of an improved public transit system is the generation of investment and wealth in areas served by the system;

The state’s public transit system should provide a variety of mobility options for people that include services for people with special needs, and services to tourism destinations, employment and retail centers, education institutions and other modes of transportation including rail, air, and water transportation services;

The use of technology is vital for making informed decisions about existing and future public transit services and for providing efficient, user responsive public transit; and

The state in partnership with local communities should support the legacy of public transit services in Rhode Island and improve, expand, and augment that system to meet the needs of the people in the twenty-first (21st) century.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 504, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 518, § 2.

39-18-2.
Authority created — Composition — Terms — Oath — Officers — Quorum — Compensation — Conflicts of interest.

There is hereby created a body corporate and politic to be known as the “Rhode Island public transit authority” (hereinafter “RIPTA”).

The authority shall consist of eight (8) members, one of whom shall be the director of the department of transportation, or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member, and seven (7) of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, with at least one of the seven (7) being a regular user of fixed-route RIPTA transportation and at least one of the seven (7) being a person with a disability. The governor shall achieve a diverse membership in the board and shall give due consideration to recommendations for nominations from the RIPTA Riders Alliance, the National Federation of the Blind of Rhode Island, the Gray Panthers of Rhode Island, the Sierra Club of Rhode Island, the Rhode Island AFL-CIO, the RIPTA Transportation Advisory Committee, the Rhode Island business community, and the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state.

Those members of the authority as of the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006] who were appointed to the authority by members of the board of the general assembly shall cease to be members of the authority on the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006], and the governor shall thereupon nominate two (2) members, each of whom shall serve the balance of the unexpired term of his or her predecessor. Those members of the authority as of the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006] who were appointed to the authority by the governor shall continue to serve the balance of their current terms. Thereafter, during the month of January in each year, the governor shall appoint members to succeed the departing members. The newly appointed members shall serve for a term of three (3) years, commencing on the day they are qualified. In the event of a vacancy occurring in the membership, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a member for the unexpired term. Any member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.

Each member of the authority, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The authority shall elect one of its members as chairperson, and shall also elect a secretary and such other officers as it deems necessary.

Four (4) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

No member of the authority shall be in the employ of, or own any stock in, or be in any way directly or indirectly pecuniarily interested in any railroad corporation, bus, or street railway company; nor shall any member of the authority personally, or through a partner or agent, render any professional service or make or perform any business contract with or for any company; nor shall any member of the authority, directly or indirectly, receive a commission, bonus, discount, present, or reward from any company.

Members of the authority shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

36-1-7

and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

The authority shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the general manager of the authority, be approved by the authority, and be conducted by the general manager of the authority. The authority may approve the use of any authority and/or staff members and/or individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the authority’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 5; P.L. 1979, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 12; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 81; P.L. 2006, ch. 103, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 75, § 1.

39-18-3.
Purposes of the authority.

It shall be the purposes of the authority to:

Provide public transit services that meet mobility needs of the people of the state, including the elderly and disabled;

Increase access to employment opportunities;

Connect different modes of public transportation, including rail, air, and water services;

Promote community design that features public transit services as defining elements of a community;

Facilitate energy conservation and efficient energy use in the transportation sector by providing public transit services; and

Mitigate traffic congestion and enhance air quality.

It shall further be the purpose of the authority to own and operate a mass motor bus, water, or rail passenger transportation system and to manage, to coordinate, and to perform vehicle maintenance for a state paratransit system. Whenever any operator of a mass motor bus, water, or rail passenger transportation system files with the public utilities administrator a petition to discontinue any service, it is the purpose and function of the authority to determine if it is in the public interest to discontinue that service. If it is determined that it is not in the public interest to discontinue that service, the authority is authorized and empowered to acquire all or any part of the transit property, or any interest therein, of the system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 504, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 518, § 1.

39-18-4.
Powers and duties of the authority.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To adopt an official seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places within the state as it may designate;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead, and be impleaded; provided, however, that any and all actions against the authority shall be brought only in the county in which the principal office of the authority shall be located;

To acquire, purchase, hold, use, and dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the authority, and to lease as lessee or lessor any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein, for such term and at such rental as the authority may deem fair and reasonable, and to sell, transfer, convey, mortgage, or give a security interest in any property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, at any time acquired by the authority;

To employ, in its discretion, planning, architectural, and engineering consultants, attorneys, accountants, construction, financial, transportation, and traffic experts and consultants, superintendents, managers, and such other officers, employees, and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;

To fix, from time to time, subject to the provisions of this chapter, schedules and such rates of fare and charges for service furnished or operated as in its judgment are best adopted to ensure sufficient income to meet the cost of service; provided, however, the authority is not empowered to operate a passenger vehicle under its control in competition with passenger vehicles of a private carrier over routes that the private carrier operates pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued to the private carrier by the division of public utilities and carriers; and provided further that the authority shall not require any person who meets the means-test criteria as defined by the Rhode Island office of healthy aging and who is either sixty-five (65) years of age, or over, or who is a person with a disability to pay more than one-half (1/2) of any fare for bus rides; provided, however, that under no circumstances shall fares or charges for special service routes be discounted. Any person who is either sixty-five (65) years of age, or over, or who is a person with a disability, who does not satisfy the means-test criteria as heretofore provided, shall only be required to pay one-half (1/2) of the fare or charge for bus rides during off-peak hours, but shall not be eligible for a reduction during peak hours. For the purposes of this chapter, “peak hours,” “off-peak hours,” and “special service routes” shall be determined annually by the authority. The authority, in conjunction with the department of human services, shall establish an advisory committee comprised of seniors/persons with disabilities who are constituent users of the authority’s services to assist in the implementation of this section;

Any person who accompanies and is assisting a person with a disability when the person with a disability uses a wheelchair shall be eligible for the same price exemptions extended to a person with a disability by subsection (a)(7)(i). The cost to the authority for providing the service to the elderly shall be paid by the state;

Any person who accompanies and is assisting a passenger who is blind or visually impaired shall be eligible for the same price exemptions extended to the passenger who is blind or visually impaired by subsection (a)(7)(i). The cost to the authority for providing the service to the elderly shall be paid by the state;

The authority shall be authorized and empowered to charge a fare for any paratransit services required by the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 37;

To borrow money and to issue bonds of the authority for any of its purposes including, without limitation, the borrowing of money in anticipation of the issuance of bonds or the receipt of any operating revenues or other funds or property to be received by the authority, and the financing of property to be owned by others and used, in whole or substantial part, by the authority for any of its purposes, all as may, from time to time, be authorized by resolution of the authority; the bonds to contain on their face a statement to the effect that neither the state nor any municipality or other political subdivision of the state shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon;

To enter into management contracts for the operation, management, and supervision of any or all transit properties under the jurisdiction of the authority, and to make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter;

Without limitation of the foregoing, to borrow money from, to receive and accept grants for or in aid of the purchase, leasing, improving, equipping, furnishing, maintaining, repairing, constructing, and operating of transit property, and to enter into contracts, leases, or other transactions with any federal agency; and to receive and accept from the state, from any municipality, or other political subdivision thereof, and from any other source, aid or contributions of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which the grants and contributions may be made;

To acquire in the name of the authority, by negotiated purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of condemnation to the extent only and in the manner as provided in this chapter, public and private lands, including public parks, playgrounds or reservations, or parts thereof, or rights therein, rights-of-way, property rights, easements, and interests as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, that all public property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable;

To contract with any municipality, public or private company or organization, whereby the authority will receive a subsidy to avoid discontinuance of service, and each municipality within the state is hereby authorized to make and enter into such contracts and to make, grant, or give to the authority a subsidy in such amount and for such period of time as it may deem advisable;

To operate open-door service from Rhode Island to and from locations in Massachusetts and Connecticut that are within five (5) miles of the Rhode Island border; and

To do all things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To effectuate the purposes of this chapter the authority shall have the following duties:

To participate in and contribute to transportation planning initiatives that are relevant to the purposes of the authority;

To plan, coordinate, develop, operate, maintain, and manage a statewide public transit system consistent with the purposes of the authority, including plans to meet demands for public transit where such demand, current or prospective, exceeds supply and/or availability of public transit services;

To work with departments, agencies, authorities, and corporations of federal, state, and local government, public and private institutions, businesses, nonprofit organizations, users of the system, and other entities and persons to coordinate public transit services and provide a seamless network of mobility options.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 113, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 30, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 120; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 89; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 89; P.L. 2001, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 504, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 518, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 241, § 1.

39-18-4.1.
Health and safety of passengers.

The authority shall have the power to establish reasonable rules of conduct for passengers for the protection of the health and safety of passengers and employees of the authority. The rules shall incorporate the provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., and §

28-5.1-7

, chapter 28 of title 11, and chapter 87 of title 42 and be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

All controversies arising out of application of any provision of this section shall be determined by the general manager, or his or her designated hearing officer, who shall afford a hearing to the passenger and/or his or her parent or guardian, and, after hearing, shall render a written decision. The decision of the general manager or hearing officer shall be final, except that the passenger aggrieved by the decision shall have a right of appeal to the superior court, which shall affirm the decision unless it is clearly erroneous or contrary to law. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

Notice shall be provided to the RIde funding agency or agencies for any hearing regarding their client/passengers on RIde vehicles. A representative of the RIde funding agency or agencies may attend the hearing. The general manager or hearing officer will consider the recommendation of the RIde funding agency’s representative in rendering his/her decision.

The decision of the general manager or hearing officer may include:

Refusing to transport a person whose violation of the rules of the authority threatens the health and safety of passengers or employees of the authority, for a period not to exceed six (6) months; and/or

Revoking a passenger’s ticket, pass, or other fare medium, regardless of the number of trips or time period for which the ticket, pass, or other fare medium is valid, if the passenger’s continued presence on an authority vehicle or at an authority facility threatens the health or safety of the authority’s other passengers or employees. The authority shall, within a reasonable time after such a revocation, refund to the passenger the unused value of the ticket, pass, or other fare medium.

Nothing under this section precludes any other action permitted by law.

All RIde buses shall be installed with passenger security cameras when federal funds become available for this purpose.

Any person seeking employment as a RIde bus driver shall undergo a criminal background check to be initiated prior to or within one week of employment. All employees hired prior to the enactment of this subsection shall be exempted from its requirements.

The applicant shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), department of attorney general, state police, or local police department where he or she resides, for a statewide criminal records check. Fingerprinting shall not be required. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in §

23-17-37

, the bureau of criminal identification, the state police, or the local police department will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information; and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, will notify the employer, in writing, that disqualifying information has been discovered.

An individual against whom disqualifying information has been found may request that a copy of the criminal background report be sent to the employer who shall make a judgment regarding the ability of the individual to drive a RIde bus. In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification, state police, or local police department shall inform the applicant and the employer in writing of this fact.

The criminal record check requirements of this section shall apply only to persons seeking to drive RIde buses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 10.

39-18-4.2.
Alteration of bus route — Public hearing.

Any alteration or elimination of any bus route within the system established by the authority pursuant to §

39-18-4

shall not take effect until a public hearing is held in the neighborhood(s) along the affected route.

The public hearing shall take place at least thirty (30) days before the bus route change is scheduled to take effect in the neighborhood(s) along the affected route.

The authority shall also prepare a neighborhood(s) impact statement prior to the public hearing, and provide it to those persons attending the public hearing, the governor, those members of the general assembly whose districts are affected by the change, and the mayor or town administrator of the city or town affected by the change.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any temporary alteration of a bus route necessitated by including, but not limited to, temporary alterations occasioned by weather, construction activity, emergency, or unforeseen condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 276, § 1.

39-18-5.
Credit of state and political subdivisions not pledged.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, or of any political subdivision. All bonds shall contain, on the face thereof, a statement to the effect that neither the state nor any political subdivision thereof shall be obligated to pay the bonds, or the interest thereon, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof, is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely from funds provided under the provisions of this chapter, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

39-18-6.
Eminent domain proceedings.

The authority shall have the power to acquire any transit property or any interest therein by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

The necessity for acquisition shall be conclusively presumed upon the adoption by the authority of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the transit property or interest therein described in the resolution is necessary to provide transit services. Within six (6) months thereafter, in the event of acquisition by eminent domain, the authority shall cause to be filed in the land evidence records of the city or town in which the transit property is located (for the purpose of this section, all personal property shall be deemed to be located in the city or town where the transit company has its principal place of business), a copy of the resolution of the authority, together with a description of the property or interest therein and a statement signed by the chairperson of the authority that the property is taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Thereupon, the authority shall file in the superior court, in and for the county in which the transit property is located, a statement of the sum of any estimate by the authority to be just compensation for the property taken. If the property is located in more than one county, the statement shall be filed in the superior court in and for the county where the transit company has its principal place of business.

Upon the filing by the authority of the copy of resolution, description, and statement in the land evidence records of the city or town, the filing in the superior court of the statement and the depositing in the superior court to the use of the persons entitled thereto of the sum as the court shall determine to be amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons having an estate or interest in the property (and the court may in its discretion take evidence on the question to determine the sum to be deposited), title to the property shall vest in the authority absolutely and in fee simple, and the authority thereupon may take possession of the property. No sum so paid into the court shall be charged with clerk’s fees of any nature.

After the filing of the copy of resolution, description, and statement, notice of the taking of the property shall be served upon the owners of and persons having an estate in or interest in the property by the sheriff or his or her deputies of the county in which the property is located, leaving a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the persons personally or at their last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in case any of the persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, the copy shall be left with the persons, if any, in charge of or having possession of the property, or interest therein, taken of such absent persons if the same are known to the officer; and after the filing of the copy of resolution, description, and statement, the secretary of the authority shall cause a copy of the resolution and statement to be published in some newspaper, published or having general circulation in the county where the property, or interest therein, may be located, at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. If any person shall agree with the authority for the price of the property or interest therein so taken, the court upon the application of the parties in interest, may order that the sum agreed upon be paid forthwith from the money deposited, as the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding.

Any owner of or persons entitled to any estate in or interest in any part of the real property or interest therein, so taken, who cannot agree with the authority for the price of the property or interest therein so taken in which he or she has an estate or interest as provided in this section, may, within three (3) months after personal notice of the taking, or, if he or she have no personal notice, may, within one year from the first publication of the copy of the resolution and statement, apply by petition to the superior court in and for the county in which the property, or interest therein, lies, setting forth the taking of his or her property, or interest therein, and praying for an assessment of damages. Upon filing of the petition, the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the authority by serving the chairperson of the authority with a certified copy thereof, and may proceed after such notice to the trial thereof; and the trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of property, or interest therein, and the amount thereof, and judgment shall be entered upon the verdict, and execution shall be issued therefor against the money so deposited in court and in default thereof against any other property of the authority. In case two (2) or more conflicting petitioners make claim to the same property, or to any interests therein, or to different interests in the same piece of property or parcel of land, the court upon motion shall consolidate their several petitions for trial at the same time, and may frame all necessary issues for the trial thereof; and all proceedings taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall take precedence over all other civil matters then pending before the court, or if the superior court in and for the county in which such property, or interest therein, lies, be not in session in the county, then the trial may be heard in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol.

If any properties, or interests therein, in which any minor or other person not capable in law to act in his or her own behalf is interested, are taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter, the superior court, upon the filing therein of any petition by or in behalf of the minor or other person, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor or other person, and the guardian may appear and be heard on behalf of the minor or other persons; and the guardian may also, with the advice and consent of the superior court, and upon such terms as the superior court may prescribe, release to the authority all claims for damages for the lands of the minor or other person or for any interests therein. Any lawfully appointed, qualified, and acting guardian or other fiduciary of the estate of any minor or other person, with the approval of the court of probate within this state having jurisdiction to authorize the sale of lands and properties within this state of any minor or other person, may, before the filing of any petition, agree with the authority upon the amount of damages suffered by the minor or other person by any taking of his or her property, or of his or her interests in any property, and may, upon receiving the amount, release to the authority all claims for damages of the minor or other person for the taking.

Whenever, from time to time, the authority has satisfied the court that the amount deposited with the court is greater than is amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons having estates or interests in the property, the court may order that the amount of any excess, including any interests or increment of any sums so deposited, shall be repaid to the authority. Whenever the authority has satisfied the court that the claims of all persons interested in land taken have been satisfied, the unexpended balance, including any interest or increment on any sums so deposited, shall be paid forthwith to the authority.

At any time during the pendency of any proceedings for the assessment of damages for property or interests therein taken, or to be taken, by eminent domain by the authority, the authority or any owner may apply to the court for an order directing an owner or the authority, as the case may be, to show cause why further proceedings should not be expedited, and the court may, upon application, make an order requiring that the hearings proceed and that any other steps be taken with all possible expedition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 120.

39-18-7.
Bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide, by resolution, for the issuance at one time, or from time to time, of bonds of the authority for any of its purposes. The bonds may be general obligations of the authority or special obligations payable only from particular funds. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the authority, and shall mature at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date or dates as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. Temporary notes of the authority issued in anticipation of revenues to be received by the authority or in anticipation of the receipt of federal, state, or local grants or other aid shall mature no later than thirteen (13) months from their respective dates or six (6) months after the expected date of receipt of the grants or aid, whichever shall be later, and shall be in an amount not exceeding the limitations imposed by the last paragraph of this section. The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the authority or shall bear his or her facsimile signature, and the official seal of the authority, or a facsimile thereof, shall be impressed or imprinted thereupon and attested by the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairperson of the authority. In case any officer whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be the officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or she had remained in office until delivery. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone, and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The authority may sell such bonds in such manner either at public or private sale and for the price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be disbursed in the manner and under restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement described in §

39-18-8

securing the bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds that shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Except as provided in the following paragraph, bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things that are specifically required by this chapter.

No bonds shall be issued by the authority unless, at the time of the adoption by the authority of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the authority shall have received from the general manager or chief financial officer of the authority a certificate indicating that the payments of principal (including any payments made to a reserve fund other than payments made from bond proceeds) and interest on the bonds, together with the payments of the principal and interest on all other then outstanding bonds of the authority, will not exceed during any fiscal year of the authority eighty percent (80%) of the revenues (including, without limitation, grants and other aid) of the authority during the fiscal year. In determining the amount of the principal and interest payments to be made during any fiscal year, there shall be deducted any payments to be made from a reserve fund previously established to provide for the payments. The certificate shall be based upon the reasonable expectations (both as to the amount of revenues to be received by the authority and as to the maximum amount of any variable payments to be made on the bonds) of the officer of the authority executing the certificate at the time the certificate is delivered. The certificate shall describe with reasonable particularity the calculations of principal and interest payments and of anticipated revenues upon which the certificate is based. A copy of the certificate shall be furnished to the governor prior to the issuance of the bonds described in the certificate and, in the case of any bonds whose issuance, according to the certificate, is expected to result in the aggregate amount of principal and interest payments (calculated as above) on the bonds and all then outstanding bonds of the authority exceeding in any fiscal year of the authority fifty percent (50%) of the revenues of the authority, the bonds shall not be issued unless the governor shall have approved the issuance or not disapproved the issuance within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the certificate. Approval or disapproval of any bond issue by the governor shall be evidenced by delivery to the authority of a certificate approving or disapproving the issue or any part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 6; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 120.